Mississippi, session 2026, SB2469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The State Personnel Board and the responsible officer of every state agency, authority, board, commission or department in whom is vested the authority to set employee compensation are hereby directed, on July 1, 2026, to grant an increase in salary to each full-time state employee under their respective jurisdictions whose salary is funded by the State General Fund, pursuant to appropriation therefor by the Legislature, which increase shall be an amount of six percent (6%) per year over and above that sum which is the annual compensation of the employee in effect on June 30, 2026.  Part-time state employees shall receive a pro rata share of a six percent (6%) salary increase based on the amount of time worked per week.  The State Personnel Board shall amend the State Variable Compensation in accordance with this requirement. SECTION 2.  Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-9-147.  The State Personnel Board shall review on an annual basis the variable compensation plan adopted by the Legislature at the regular session of 1981 and subsequently implemented by the State Personnel Board.  Each state department or agency subject to the variable compensation plan shall prepare an annual written report under the direction of the head of that department or agency outlining the impact which the plan has had on that department or agency during the preceding fiscal year. Such department or agency report shall be submitted to the State Personnel Board and shall become a part of the board's annual review of the variable compensation plan.  After conducting its annual review of the plan and studying the report of each department or agency, the State Personnel Board shall prepare a written legislative report, to be submitted to the members of the Mississippi Legislature prior to January 1 of each year.  This written report shall accurately reflect the effect of the variable compensation plan on the various departments or agencies subject to the plan.  From and after July 1, 1985, the plan shall be named the "Colonel Guy Groff State Variable Compensation Plan."  From and after July 1, 2022, the plan shall be named the "Colonel Guy Groff/Neville Kenning Variable Compensation Plan." SECTION 3.  Section 25-9-148, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-9-148.  Before September 1, 1996, and before September 1 of every year thereafter, the State Personnel Board shall prepare a written report to be submitted to the Chairmen of the House of Representatives Appropriations and Fees and Salaries of Public Officers Committees, the Chairmen of the Senate Appropriations and Fees, Salaries and Administration Committees and the Legislative Budget Office specifically describing every increase in compensation, other than salary increases authorized by the Legislature, or additional compensation that was awarded to any state officer, administrator, executive head, employee or employees during the next preceding fiscal year.  For each increase or additional compensation awarded, the report shall include no less than the following information:  the annual salary of the officer, administrator, executive head or employee before the increase; the total amount of the increase or additional compensation; the justification for the increase or additional compensation; the effective date of the increase or additional compensation; and the source of the additional compensation, including federal or private funds. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.